Oklahoma, session 2026, SB818.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2890, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 5, 1st Extraordinary Session, O.S.L.


2023 (68 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 2890), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 2890. A. In addition to the amount of the homestead


exemption authorized and allowed in Section 2889 of this title, an


additional exemption is hereby granted, to the extent of One


Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) of


the assessed valuation on each homestead of heads of households


whose gross household income from all sources for the preceding



Req. No. 423 Page 1


calendar year did not exceed Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00)


Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00).


B. The term “gross household income” as used in this section


means the gross amount of income of every type, regardless of the


source, received by all persons occupying the same household,


whether such income was taxable or nontaxable for federal or state


income tax purposes, including pensions, annuities, federal Social


Security, unemployment payments, public assistance payments,


alimony, support money, workers’ compensation, loss-of-time


insurance payments, capital gains, and any other type of income


received, and excluding gifts. The term “gross household income”


gross household income shall not include any veterans’ disability


compensation payments or the amount of any federal stimulus or


relief payments related to the COVID-19 virus. The term “head of


household” as used in this section means a person who as owner or


joint owner maintains a home and furnishes support for the home,


furnishings, and other material necessities.


C. The application for the additional homestead exemption shall


be made each year on or before March 15 or within thirty (30) days


from and after receipt by the taxpayer of notice of valuation


increase, whichever is later, and upon the form prescribed by the


Oklahoma Tax Commission, which shall require the taxpayer to certify


as to the amount of gross income. Upon request of the county



Req. No. 423 Page 2


assessor, the Oklahoma Tax Commission shall assist in verifying the


correctness of the amount of the gross income.


D. For persons sixty-five (65) sixty (60) years of age or older


as of March 15 and who have previously qualified for the additional


homestead exemption, no annual application shall be required in


order to receive the exemption provided by this section; however,


any person whose gross household income in any calendar year exceeds


the amount specified in this section in order to qualify for the


additional homestead exemption shall notify the county assessor and


the additional exemption shall not be allowed for the applicable


year. Any executor or administrator of an estate within which is


included a homestead property exempt pursuant to the provisions of


this section shall notify the county assessor of the change in


status of the homestead property if such property is not the


homestead of a person who would be eligible for the exemption


provided by this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-423 QD 1/19/2025 5:44:02 AM











Req. No. 423 Page 3